Utah statutes.
49-11-901.5.   Premium tax revenues -- Distribution.

(1) (a)  In accordance with this section there shall be paid to the office:

(i)  50% of the annual tax levied, assessed, and collected under Title 59, Chapter 9, Taxation of Admitted Insurers, upon premiums for property insurance, as defined under Section 31A-1-301, and as applied to fire and allied lines insurance collected by insurance companies within the state; and

(ii)  10% of all money assessed and collected under Title 59, Chapter 9, Taxation of Admitted Insurers, upon premiums for life insurance, as defined in Section 31A-1-301, within the state.

(b)  Payments to the fund shall be made annually until the service liability under this part is liquidated, after which the tax revenue provided in this Subsection (1) ceases.

(2)  The office shall distribute the premium tax revenue paid under Subsection (1) as follows:

(a)  an amount determined by the office to fully fund the long-term disability program provided for firefighters under Section 49-23-601;

(b)  an amount determined by the office to the Firefighters' Retirement Trust Fund created under Section 49-16-104 equal to the amount when calculated as a percentage of the certified contribution rate for members in Divisions A and B, as defined under Section 49-16-301, that is the percentage of the certified contribution rate paid to the Firefighters' Retirement Trust Fund on July 1, 2004; and

(c)  any remaining amount in accordance with Section 49-11-902.



Enacted by Chapter 290, 2011 General Session 

Enacted by Chapter 439, 2011 General Session

